Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Chapter 61

Mergers, Membership Exchanges, Entity Conversions, and For-Profit Conversions

48-61-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Converted entity” means the domestic corporation or domestic unincorporated entity that adopts a plan of entity conversion or the foreign unincorporated entity converting to a domestic corporation;

“Eligible entity” means a domestic or foreign unincorporated entity or a domestic or foreign business corporation;

“Eligible interests” means interests or shares;

“Filing entity” means an unincorporated entity that is of a type that is created by filing a public organic document;

“Foreign business corporation” means a corporation for-profit incorporated under an organic law other than the laws of this state;

“Foreign unincorporated entity” means an unincorporated entity whose internal affairs are governed by an organic law other than the laws of this state;

“Interest” means either or both of the following rights under the organic law of an unincorporated entity:

The right to receive distributions from the entity either in the ordinary course or upon liquidation; or

The right to receive notice or vote on issues involving its internal affairs, other than as an agent, assignee, proxy, or person responsible for managing its business and affairs;

“Interest holder” means a person who holds of record an interest;

“Membership” means the rights of a member in a domestic or foreign nonprofit corporation and includes the rights and obligations a member has pursuant to a corporation's charter, bylaws and chapters 51-68 of this title;

“Party to a merger or membership exchange” means any domestic or foreign nonprofit corporation, or eligible entity that will:

Merge in a plan of merger;

Acquire memberships or eligible interests of another domestic or foreign corporation, or an eligible entity in a membership exchange; or

Have all of its memberships or eligible interests of one (1) or more classes or series acquired in membership exchange;

“Survivor” means the corporation or unincorporated entity that is in existence immediately after consummation of a merger or entity conversion pursuant to this chapter; and

“Voting memberships” means memberships that entitle their holders to vote unconditionally in the election of directors.

Acts 2014, ch. 899, § 65.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 61, §§ 48-61-101 — 48-61-107 (Acts 1987, ch. 242, §§ 11.01-11.07), concerning merger, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2014, ch. 899, §§ 65-72, effective January 1, 2015.

Law Reviews.

Congratulations, It's A Merger!, 50 Tenn. B.J. 22 (2014).

The Market for Preclusion in Merger Litigation, 66 Vand. L. Rev. 1053 (2013).

48-61-102. Permitted mergers — Plan of Merger.

Subject to the limitations on public benefit corporations in § 48-61-122, one (1) or more domestic nonprofit corporations may merge with one (1) or more domestic or foreign nonprofit corporations or eligible entities pursuant to a plan of merger, or two (2) or more foreign nonprofit corporations or domestic or foreign eligible entities may merge into a new domestic nonprofit corporation to be created in the merger in the manner provided in this chapter. The merger shall result in a single survivor.

A foreign nonprofit corporation, or a foreign eligible entity, may be a party to a merger with a domestic nonprofit corporation, or may be created by the terms of the plan of merger, only if the merger is permitted by the organic law of the foreign nonprofit corporation or eligible entity. If the organic law of a domestic eligible entity does not prohibit a merger with a domestic nonprofit corporation but does not provide procedures for the approval of a merger, a plan of merger may be adopted and approved, and the merger effectuated, in accordance with the procedures in this chapter. For the purposes of applying this chapter:

The eligible entity, its members or interest holders, eligible interests, and organic documents, taken together shall be deemed to be a domestic nonprofit corporation, members, memberships, charter and bylaws, respectively and vice versa, as the context may require; and

If the business and affairs of the eligible entity are managed by a group of persons that is not identical to the members or interest holders, that group shall be deemed to be the board of directors.

The plan of merger must be in the form of an organic document and set forth:

The name of each domestic or foreign nonprofit corporation or eligible entity planning to merge and the name of each domestic or foreign nonprofit corporation or eligible entity that shall survive the merger;

The terms and conditions of the merger;

The manner and basis of converting the memberships of each merging domestic or foreign nonprofit corporation and eligible interests of each merging domestic or foreign eligible entity into memberships or other securities, eligible interests, obligations, rights to acquire memberships, other securities or eligible interests, cash, other property, or any combination of the foregoing;

The charter of any domestic or foreign business corporation or nonprofit corporation, or the organic documents of any domestic or foreign unincorporated entity, to be created by the merger, or if a new domestic or foreign nonprofit corporation or unincorporated entity is not to be created by the merger, any amendments to the survivor's charter and bylaws or organic documents; and

Any other provision required or permitted by the organic law under which any party to the merger is organized or by which it is governed, or by the charter or organic documents of any such party.

The plan of merger may set forth any other provisions relating to the merger.

Terms of a plan of merger may be made dependent on facts objectively ascertainable outside the plan in accordance with § 48-51-301(j).

The plan of merger may also include a provision that the plan may be amended prior to filing articles of merger, but if the members of a domestic nonprofit corporation that is a party to the merger are required or permitted to vote on the plan, the plan must provide that subsequent to approval of the plan by such members the plan may not be amended to change the following:

The amount or kind of memberships or other securities, eligible interests, obligations, rights to acquire memberships, other securities, or eligible interests, cash, or other property to be received under the plan by the members of or owners of eligible interests in any party to the merger;

The charter of any corporation, or the organic documents of any unincorporated entity, that will survive or be created as a result of the merger, except for changes permitted by § 48-60-102 or by comparable provisions of the organic laws of any such foreign corporation or domestic or foreign unincorporated entity; or

Any of the other terms or conditions of the plan if the change would adversely affect such members in any material respect.

Property held in trust or for charitable purposes under the laws of this state by a domestic or foreign eligible entity shall not be diverted by a merger from the objects for which it was donated, granted, or devised, unless and until the eligible entity obtains a court order specifying the disposition of the property to the extent required by and pursuant to § 35-15-413 or enters into a nonjudicial settlement agreement pursuant to § 35-15-111.

Acts 2014, ch. 899, § 66.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 61, §§ 48-61-101 — 48-61-107 (Acts 1987, ch. 242, §§ 11.01-11.07), concerning merger, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2014, ch. 899, §§ 65-72, effective January 1, 2015.

48-61-103. Plan of membership exchange.

Subject to the limitations on public benefit corporations in § 48-61-122, through a membership exchange:

A domestic nonprofit corporation may acquire all of the memberships of one (1) or more classes or series of memberships of another domestic or foreign nonprofit corporation or all of the interests of one (1) or more classes or series of interests of a domestic or foreign other entity, in exchange for memberships, other securities, interests, obligations, rights to acquire memberships, other securities, or interests, cash, other property, or any combination of the foregoing, pursuant to a plan of membership exchange; or

All of the memberships of one (1) or more classes or series of memberships of a domestic nonprofit corporation may be acquired by another domestic or foreign nonprofit corporation or other entity, in exchange for memberships, other securities, interests, obligations, rights to acquire memberships, other securities or interests, cash, other property, or any combination of the foregoing, pursuant to a plan of membership exchange.

A foreign nonprofit corporation or eligible entity may be a party to a membership exchange only if the membership exchange is permitted by the organic law under which the corporation or other entity is organized or by which it is governed. If the organic law of a domestic other entity does not prohibit a membership exchange with a domestic nonprofit corporation but does not provide procedures for the approval of a membership exchange, a plan of membership exchange may be adopted and approved and the membership exchange effectuated in accordance with the procedures, if any, for a merger. If the organic law of a domestic other entity does not provide procedures for the approval of either a membership exchange or an exchange of interests similar to a membership exchange or a merger, a plan of membership exchange may be adopted and approved and the membership exchange effectuated in accordance with the procedures in this chapter. For the purposes of applying this chapter:

The other entity, its interest holders, interests, and organic documents taken together shall be deemed to be a domestic nonprofit corporation, members, memberships, charter and bylaws, respectively and vice versa, as the context may require; and

If the business and affairs of the other entity are managed by a group of persons that is not identical to the interest holders, that group shall be deemed to be the board of directors.

The plan of membership exchange must be in the form of an organic document and set forth:

The name of each corporation or other entity whose memberships or interests will be acquired and the name of the acquiring corporation or other entity;

The terms and conditions of the membership exchange;

The manner and basis of exchanging memberships of each corporation or interests in another entity whose memberships or interests will be acquired under the membership exchange into memberships, other securities, interests, obligations, rights to acquire memberships, other securities or interests, cash, other property, or any combination of the foregoing; and

Any other provisions required by the organic law under which any party to the membership exchange is organized or by which it is governed, or by the charter or organic document of any such party.

The plan of membership exchange may set forth other provisions relating to the membership exchange.

This section does not limit the power of a domestic nonprofit corporation to acquire all or part of the memberships of one (1) or more classes or series of another corporation or interests of another entity through a voluntary exchange or otherwise.

Acts 2014, ch. 899, § 67.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 61, §§ 48-61-101 — 48-61-107 (Acts 1987, ch. 242, §§ 11.01-11.07), concerning merger, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2014, ch. 899, §§ 65-72, effective January 1, 2015.

48-61-104. Approval and adoption of plan of merger or membership exchange.

In the case of a domestic nonprofit corporation that is a party to a merger or membership exchange:

The plan of merger or membership exchange shall be adopted by the board of directors of each party to the merger or membership exchange and approved by the members, if any, of each party;

Except as provided in subdivision (7) and in § 48-61-105, after adopting the plan of merger or membership exchange, the board of directors shall submit the plan of merger or membership exchange for approval to the members if there are members entitled to vote on the plan. The board of directors must also transmit to the members a recommendation that the members approve the plan, unless the board of directors makes a determination that because of conflicts of interest or other special circumstances it should not make such a recommendation, in which case the board of directors must transmit to the members the basis for that determination;

The board of directors may condition its submission of the plan of merger or membership exchange to its members on any basis;

If the plan of merger or membership exchange is required to be approved by the members, and if the approval is to be given at a meeting, the corporation shall notify each member, whether or not entitled to vote, of the members' meeting at which the plan is to be submitted for approval. The notice shall state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the plan of merger or membership exchange and shall contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the plan. If the corporation is to be merged into an existing corporation or other entity, the notice shall also include or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the charter or organic documents of that corporation or other entity. If the corporation is to be merged into a corporation or other entity that is to be created pursuant to the merger, the notice shall include or be accompanied by a copy or a summary of the charter or organizational documents of the new corporation or other entity;

Unless chapters 51-68 of this title, the charter, the organic documents or the board of directors acting pursuant to subdivision (3) requires a greater vote or a vote by voting groups, the plan of merger or membership exchange to be authorized must be approved by each voting group entitled to vote separately on the plan by a majority of all the votes entitled to be cast on the plan by that voting group;

Separate voting by voting groups is required:

On a plan of merger, by each class or series of memberships that would be entitled to vote as a separate group on a provision in the plan that, if contained in a proposed amendment to the charter or bylaws, would entitle the class of members to vote as a class on the proposed amendment under § 48-60-104 or § 48-60-205;

On a plan of membership exchange, by each class or series of memberships included in the exchange, with each class or series constituting a separate voting group; or

On a plan of merger or membership exchange, if the voting group is entitled under the charter or by agreement to vote as a voting group to approve a plan of merger or membership exchange;

Unless the charter otherwise provides, approval by the members of a domestic corporation of a plan of merger or membership exchange shall not be required if:

The corporation will survive the merger or is the acquiring corporation in a membership exchange;

Except for amendments enumerated in § 48-60-102, its charter will not differ from the charter before the merger;

Each member of the corporation whose memberships were outstanding immediately before the effective date of the merger or exchange will hold the same number of memberships, with identical designations, preferences, limitations and relative rights, immediately after the effective date of the merger or exchange;

The voting power of the members and memberships outstanding immediately after the merger or exchanging, plus the voting power of the memberships issuable as a result of the merger or exchange (either by the conversion of memberships, rights or eligible interests issued pursuant to the merger or exchange or by the exercise of rights or contracts issued pursuant to the merger or exchange), will not exceed by more than twenty percent (20%) the voting power of the total memberships of the corporation immediately before the merger or exchange; and

The number of participating memberships immediately after the merger or exchange, plus the number of participating memberships issuable as a result of the merger or exchange (either by the conversion of memberships, rights or eligible interests issued pursuant to the merger or exchange by the exercise of rights or options issued pursuant to the merger or exchange), will not exceed by more than twenty percent (20%) the total number of participating memberships immediately before the merger or exchange; and

If as a result of a merger or membership exchange, one (1) or more members of a domestic corporation would become subject to owner liability for the debts, obligations, or liabilities of any other person or entity, approval of the plan of merger or membership exchange shall require the execution, by each member, of a separate written consent to become subject to such owner liability.

Acts 2014, ch. 899, § 68; 2015, ch. 60, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 61, §§ 48-61-101 — 48-61-107 (Acts 1987, ch. 242, §§ 11.01-11.07), concerning merger, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2014, ch. 899, §§ 65-72, effective January 1, 2015.

48-61-105. Merger between parent and subsidiary corporations — Plan of merger — Approval.

Subject to the limitations on public benefit corporations in § 48-61-122, a domestic parent corporation owning at least ninety percent (90%) of the voting memberships or eligible interests of each class and series of a domestic or foreign subsidiary corporation or eligible interests of another controlled eligible entity may either:

Merge the subsidiary corporation or other entity into the parent corporation;

Merge the parent corporation into the subsidiary corporation or other eligible entity; or

Merge two (2) or more subsidiary or controlled corporations or other controlled eligible entities with and into each other.

The board of directors of the parent corporation shall adopt a plan of merger that sets forth:

The name of the parent corporation owning at least ninety percent (90%) of the outstanding voting memberships of the subsidiary or controlled corporation or eligible interests of the other controlled eligible entity and the name of the subsidiary corporation or corporations or other controlled eligible entity or entities to be a party to the merger, and the name of the corporation or other entity that is to survive the merger;

The terms and conditions of the merger;

The manner and basis of converting the memberships of each corporation or eligible interests of the controlled other entity into memberships, eligible interests, obligations or other securities of the survivor or of any other corporation or other entity or into cash or other property or any combination of the foregoing; and

Such other provisions with respect to the proposed merger as the board considers necessary or desirable.

No vote of the members of a subsidiary corporation or approval of interest holders of a subsidiary or controlled other entity shall be required with respect to such a merger. If the parent corporation will be the survivor, no vote of its members shall be required. If the subsidiary corporation or other controlled eligible entity will be the survivor, the approval of the members of the parent corporation shall be obtained in the manner provided in § 48-61-104.

If under subsection (c) approval of a merger by the subsidiary's or eligible entity's members or interest holders is not required, the parent corporation shall, within ten (10) days after the effective date of the merger, notify each of the subsidiary's or eligible entity's members or interest holders that the merger has become effective.

Except as provided in subsections (a)-(d), a merger between a parent and a subsidiary shall be governed by the provisions of this chapter applicable to mergers generally.

Acts 2014, ch. 899, § 69.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 61, §§ 48-61-101 — 48-61-107 (Acts 1987, ch. 242, §§ 11.01-11.07), concerning merger, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2014, ch. 899, §§ 65-72, effective January 1, 2015.

48-61-106. Abandonment of merger or membership exchange — Certificate of abandonment.

After a plan of merger or membership exchange has been adopted and approved as required by chapters 51-68 of this title, and at any time before the merger or membership exchange has become effective, the merger or membership exchange may be abandoned (subject to any contractual rights) by any corporation or other entity that is a party to the merger or membership exchange, without action by the members or interest holders of such party, in accordance with the procedures set forth in the plan of merger or membership exchange or, if no such procedures are set forth in the plan, in the manner determined by the board of directors of such corporation or the managers of such other entity subject to any contractual rights of other parties to the merger or membership exchange.

If the merger or membership exchange is abandoned after articles of merger or membership exchange have been filed with the secretary of state but before the merger or membership exchange has become effective, a statement, executed on behalf of each party to the merger or membership exchange by an officer or other duly authorized representative, stating that the merger or membership exchange has been abandoned in accordance with the plan and this section, shall be filed with the secretary of state prior to the effectiveness of the merger or membership exchange.

The secretary of state shall, when all fees have been paid as required by law:

Endorse on the original and each copy the word “filed” and the month, day, and year of the filing thereof;

File the original in the office of the secretary of state; and

Issue a certificate of abandonment to each party to the merger or membership exchange.

Upon the filing of such statement by the secretary of state, the merger or membership exchange shall be deemed abandoned and shall not become effective.

Acts 2014, ch. 899, § 70.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 61, §§ 48-61-101 — 48-61-107 (Acts 1987, ch. 242, §§ 11.01-11.07), concerning merger, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2014, ch. 899, §§ 65-72, effective January 1, 2015.

48-61-107. Articles of merger or membership exchange — Contents — Filing.

After a plan of merger or membership exchange has been adopted and approved as required by this chapter, articles of merger or membership exchange shall be executed on behalf of each party to the merger or membership exchange by an officer or other duly authorized representative and shall set forth:

The names of the parties to the merger or membership exchange and the date on which the merger or membership exchange occurred or is to be effective;

If the charter or organic documents of the survivor of a merger are amended, or if a new corporation is created as a result of a merger, the amendments to the survivor's charter or organic documents or the charter of the new corporation;

If approval by the members of a domestic corporation that is a party to the merger or membership exchange is not required by this chapter, a statement to that effect and the date on which the plan was adopted by the board of directors;

If approval by the members of a domestic corporation that is a party to the merger or membership exchange is required by this chapter, a statement to that effect and a statement that the plan was approved by the affirmative vote of the required percentage of all of:

The votes entitled to be cast if there is no voting by voting groups; or

The votes entitled to be cast by each voting group having the right to vote separately on the plan and the votes cast by the outstanding memberships otherwise entitled to vote on the plan;

If the corporation is a public benefit corporation, a statement that notice of the plan of merger or membership exchange was given to the attorney general and reporter in the manner required by § 48-61-123 and that either:

The plan of merger or membership exchange was approved by order of a court of record of this state; or

The corporation received a written statement of no enforcement intent with respect to the plan from the attorney general and reporter; and

As to each foreign corporation and each other entity that was a party to the merger or membership exchange, a statement that the plan and performance of its terms were duly authorized by all action required by the laws under which it was organized and by its charter or organic documents.

The original of the articles of merger or membership exchange shall be delivered to the secretary of state for filing together with the required filing fee. A merger or membership exchange takes effect upon the effective date of the articles of merger or membership exchange.

Acts 2014, ch. 899, § 71.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 61, §§ 48-61-101 — 48-61-107 (Acts 1987, ch. 242, §§ 11.01-11.07), concerning merger, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2014, ch. 899, §§ 65-72, effective January 1, 2015.

48-61-108. Effect of merger or membership exchange.

When a merger becomes effective:

The corporation or eligible entity that is designated in the plan of merger as an entity surviving the merger shall survive, and the separate existence of every other corporation or eligible entity that is a party to the merger shall cease;

All property owned by, and every contract right possessed by, each corporation or eligible entity that is merged into the survivor shall be vested in the survivor without reversion or impairment;

All liabilities of each corporation or eligible entity that is merged into the survivor shall be vested in the survivor;

A proceeding pending against any corporation or eligible entity that is a party to the merger may be continued as if the merger did not occur or the name of the survivor may be substituted in the proceeding for any corporation or eligible entity whose existence ceased in the merger;

The charter or organic document of the survivor shall be amended to the extent provided in the plan of merger;

The charter or organic documents of a survivor created by the plan of merger shall become effective; and

The memberships of each corporation and the interests of each eligible entity that are to be converted into memberships, other securities, interests, obligations, rights to acquire memberships, other securities or eligible interests, cash, other property, or any combination of the foregoing in the merger shall be converted or exchanged, and the former holders of such memberships or eligible interests shall be entitled only to the rights provided to them in the plan of merger or to their rights under the organic law of the eligible entity.

When a membership exchange takes effect, the memberships of each corporation that are to be exchanged for memberships, other securities, interests, obligations, rights to acquire memberships, other securities or eligible interests, cash, other property or any combination of the foregoing in the membership exchange shall be exchanged, and the former holders of such memberships shall be entitled only to the rights provided in the plan of membership exchange.

Upon a merger becoming effective, a foreign corporation, or a foreign eligible entity, that is the survivor of the merger is deemed to:

Appoint the secretary of state as its agent for service of process in a proceeding to enforce the rights of members of each domestic corporation that is a party to the merger; and

Agree that it will promptly pay the amount, if any, to which such members are entitled under the plan of merger.

The effect of a merger or membership exchange on the owner liability of a person who had owner liability for some or all of the debts, obligations or liabilities of a party to the merger or membership exchange shall be as follows:

The merger or membership exchange does not discharge any owner liability under the organic law of the entity in which the person was a member or interest holder to the extent any such owner liability arose before the effective time of the articles of merger or membership exchange;

The person shall not have owner liability under the organic law of the entity in which the person was member or eligible interest holder prior to the merger or membership exchange for any debt, obligation or liability that arises after the effective time of the articles of merger or membership exchange;

The organic law of any entity for which the person had owner liability before the merger or membership exchange shall continue to apply to the collection or discharge of any owner liability preserved by subdivision (d)(1), as if the merger or membership exchange had not occurred; and

The person shall have whatever rights of contribution from other persons are provided by the organic law of the entity for which the person had owner liability with respect to any owner liability preserved by subdivision (d)(1), as if the merger or membership exchange had not occurred.

A merger or membership exchange shall take effect upon the date the articles of merger or membership exchange are filed as provided in § 48-61-107(b) or on such later date as may be specified in the plan of merger or share exchange.

Acts 2014, ch. 899, § 72.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 61, §§ 48-61-101 — 48-61-107 (Acts 1987, ch. 242, §§ 11.01-11.07), concerning merger, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2014, ch. 899, §§ 65-72, effective January 1, 2015.

48-61-109. Plan of entity conversion.

Subject to the limitations on public benefit corporations in § 48-61-122, a domestic nonprofit corporation may become a domestic unincorporated entity pursuant to a plan of entity conversion.

Subject to the limitations on public benefit corporations in § 48-61-122, a domestic nonprofit corporation may become a foreign unincorporated entity if the entity conversion is permitted by the laws of the foreign jurisdiction.

A domestic unincorporated entity may become a domestic nonprofit corporation. If the organic law of a domestic unincorporated entity does not provide procedures for the approval of an entity conversion, the conversion shall be adopted and approved, and the entity conversion effectuated, in the same manner as a merger of the unincorporated entity. If the organic law of a domestic unincorporated entity does not provide procedures for the approval of either an entity conversion or a merger, a plan of entity conversion shall be adopted and approved, and the entity conversion effectuated, in accordance with the procedures in this chapter. Without limiting this subsection (c), a domestic unincorporated entity whose organic law does not provide procedures for the approval of an entity conversion shall be subject to subsection (e) and § 48-61-111(7). For purposes of applying this chapter:

The unincorporated entity, its interest holders, interests, and organic documents taken together, shall be deemed to be a domestic nonprofit corporation, members, memberships and charters, respectively, and vice versa, as the context may require; and

If the business and affairs of the unincorporated entity are managed by a group of persons that is not identical to the interest holders, that group shall be deemed to be the board of directors.

A foreign unincorporated entity may become a domestic nonprofit corporation if the organic law of the foreign unincorporated entity authorizes it to become a nonprofit corporation in another jurisdiction.

If any provision of a debt security, note or similar evidence of indebtedness for money borrowed, whether secured or unsecured, or a contract of any kind, issued, incurred or executed by a domestic nonprofit corporation before January 1, 2015, applies to a merger of the corporation and the document does not refer to an entity conversion of the corporation, the provision shall be deemed to apply to an entity conversion of the corporation until such time as the provision is amended on or subsequent to January 1, 2015.

If a plan of entity conversion includes a for-profit conversion of the corporation, the corporation must also comply with §§ 48-61-116 — 48-61-121.

Acts 2014, ch. 899, § 72.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 61, §§ 48-61-101 — 48-61-107 (Acts 1987, ch. 242, §§ 11.01-11.07), concerning merger, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2014, ch. 899, §§ 65-72, effective January 1, 2015.

48-61-110. Contents of plan of entity conversion.

A plan of entity conversion must include:

A statement of the type of other entity the survivor will be and, if it will be a foreign other entity, its jurisdiction of organization;

The terms and conditions of the conversion;

The manner and basis of converting the memberships of the domestic nonprofit corporation following its conversion into interests or other securities, obligations, rights to acquire interests or other securities, cash, other property, or any combination of the foregoing; and

The full text, as they will be in effect immediately after consummation of the conversion, of the organic documents of the survivor.

The plan of entity conversion may also include a provision that the plan may be amended prior to filing articles of entity conversion, except that subsequent to approval of the plan by the members, the plan may not be amended to change:

The amount or kind of memberships or other securities, interests, obligations, rights to acquire memberships, other securities or interests, cash or other property to be received under the plan by the members;

The organic documents that will be in effect immediately following the conversion, except for changes permitted by a provision of the organic law of the survivor comparable to § 48-60-102; or

Any of the other terms or conditions of the plan if the change would adversely affect any of the members in any material respect.

Terms of a plan of entity conversion may be made dependent upon facts objectively ascertainable outside the plan in accordance with § 48-51-301.

Acts 2014, ch. 899, § 72.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 61, §§ 48-61-101 — 48-61-107 (Acts 1987, ch. 242, §§ 11.01-11.07), concerning merger, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2014, ch. 899, §§ 65-72, effective January 1, 2015.

48-61-111. Approval of entity conversion of a domestic nonprofit corporation to a domestic or foreign unincorporated entity.

In the case of an entity conversion of a domestic nonprofit corporation to a domestic or foreign unincorporated entity:

The plan of entity conversion must be adopted by the board of directors;

After adopting the plan of entity conversion, the board of directors must submit the plan to the members for their approval if there are members entitled to vote on the plan. The board of directors must also transmit to the members a recommendation that the members approve the plan, unless the board of directors makes a determination that because of conflicts of interest or other special circumstances it should not make such a recommendation, in which case the board of directors must transmit to the members the basis for that determination;

The board of directors may condition its submission of the plan of entity conversion to the members on any basis;

If the approval of the members is to be given at a meeting, the corporation must notify each member, whether or not entitled to vote, of the meeting of members at which the plan of entity conversion is to be submitted for approval. The notice must state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the plan and must contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the plan. The notice shall include or be accompanied by a full text copy of the organic documents as they will be in effect immediately after the entity conversion;

Unless chapters 51-67 of this title, the charter, or the board of directors acting pursuant to subdivision (3) requires a greater vote or a vote by voting groups, the plan of conversion to be authorized must be approved by each voting group entitled to vote separately on the plan by a majority of all the votes entitled to be cast on the plan by that voting group;

If any provision of the charter, bylaws or an agreement to which any of the directors or members are parties, adopted or entered into before January 1, 2015, applies to a merger of the corporation and the document does not refer to an entity conversion of the corporation, the provision shall be deemed to apply to an entity conversion of the corporation until such time as the provision is subsequently amended; and

If as a result of the conversion one (1) or more members of the corporation would become subject to owner liability for the debts, obligations, or liabilities of any other person or entity, approval of the plan of conversion shall require the execution, by each such member, of a separate written consent to become subject to such owner liability.

Acts 2014, ch. 899, § 72.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 61, §§ 48-61-101 — 48-61-107 (Acts 1987, ch. 242, §§ 11.01-11.07), concerning merger, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2014, ch. 899, §§ 65-72, effective January 1, 2015.